Florida, session 2026, HB1095.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
10
11 Section 1. Subsection (1) of section 145.051, Florida
12 Statutes, is amended to read:
13 145.051 Clerk of circuit court; county comptroller.—
14 (1) Each clerk of the circuit court and each county
15 comptroller shall receive as salary the amount indicated, based
16 on the population of his or her county. In addition, a
17 compensation shall be made for population increments over the
18 minimum for each population group, which shall be determined by
19 multiplying the population in excess of the minimum for the
20 group times the group rate.
21
Pop. Base Group Rate
Group County Pop. Range Salary
22
Minimum Maximum
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1095-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1095 2026
23
I $26,250
-0- 49,999 $21,250 $0.07875
24
II 29,400
50,000 99,999 24,400 0.06300
25
III 32,550
100,000 199,999 27,550 0.02625
26
IV 35,175
200,000 399,999 30,175 0.01575
27
V 38,325
400,000 999,999 33,325 0.00525
28
VI 41,475
1,000,000 36,475 0.00400
29
30 Section 2. Subsection (1) of section 145.09, Florida
31 Statutes, is amended to read:
32 145.09 Supervisor of elections.—
33 (1) Each supervisor of elections shall receive as salary
34 the amount indicated, based on the population of his or her
35 county. In addition, a compensation shall be made for population
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1095-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1095 2026
36 increments over the minimum for each population group, which
37 shall be determined by multiplying the population in excess of
38 the minimum for the group times the group rate.
39
Pop. Base Group Rate
Group County Pop. Range Salary
40
Minimum Maximum
41
I $26,250
-0- 49,999 $21,250 $0.07875
42
II $29,400
50,000 99,999 24,400 0.06300
43
III $32,550
100,000 199,999 27,550 0.02625
44
IV $35,175
200,000 399,999 30,175 0.01575
45
V $38,325
400,000 999,999 33,325 0.00525
46
VI 1,000,000 $41,475 0.00400
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1095-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1095 2026
36,475
47
48 Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1095-00